Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.745

Unlawful practice—Employing unlicensed dentist—Penalty.

(1) No manager, proprietor, partnership, or association owning, operating, or controlling any room, office, or dental parlors, where dental work is done, provided, or contracted for, shall employ or retain any unlicensed person or dentist as an operator; nor shall fail, within ten days after demand made by the secretary of health or the commission in writing sent by certified mail, addressed to any such manager, proprietor, partnership, or association at the room, office, or dental parlor, to furnish the secretary of health or the commission with the names and addresses of all persons practicing or assisting in the practice of dentistry in his or her place of business or under his or her control, together with a sworn statement showing by what license or authority the persons are practicing dentistry.

(2) The sworn statement shall not be used as evidence in any subsequent court proceedings, except in a prosecution for perjury connected with its execution.

(3) Any violation of this section is improper, unprofessional, and dishonorable conduct, and grounds for injunction proceedings as provided by this chapter.

(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a violation of this section is also a gross misdemeanor.

(b) The failure to furnish the information as may be requested in accordance with this section is a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 125; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 224; 1991 c 3 s 73; 1977 ex.s. c 5 s 31; 1957 c 52 s 38; 1953 c 93 s 7. Prior: 1937 c 45 s 1, part; 1935 c 112 s 18, part; RRS s 10031-18, part. Formerly RCW 18.32.350.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.